Nebraska, session 109, LB118.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 38-2866.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2866.01 (1) A pharmacist may supervise any combination of pharmacy
technicians and pharmacist interns at any time up to a total of four three
people.
(2) A pharmacist intern shall be supervised at all times while performing
the functions of a pharmacist intern which may include all aspects of the
practice of pharmacy unless otherwise restricted. This subsection section does
not apply to a pharmacist intern who is receiving experiential training
directed by the accredited pharmacy program in which he or she is enrolled.
(3) For any pharmacist supervising four pharmacy technicians or pharmacist
interns, at least one person shall be a certified pharmacy technician pursuant
to section 38-2890.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-2866.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-1-